apertium-kir.kir.lexc
LEXICON V-FINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE

%<fut%>:%>%{A%}р V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                                 ! 
%<fut%>:%>%{A%}%{A%}р V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                            ! Dir/LR
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%с V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                  !
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{A%}с V-PERS-COP-SUF ;              ! Dir/LR

%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-PAST ;                                !
%<neg%>%<ifi%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н% жок V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                !
%<neg%>%<ifi%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-PAST ;             ! FIXME: what to do about this  Dir/LR

%<past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                           ! 
%<neg%>%<past%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н% эмес V-PERS-COP-SUF ;              ! 
%<neg%>%<past%>:%{B%}%{A%}%>%{G%}%{A%}н V-PERS-COP-SUF ;          ! Dir/LR

%<past%>%<evid%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н% экен V-PERS-COP-SUF ;             ! evidential general past
%<neg%>%<past%>%<evid%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н% жок% экен V-PERS-COP-SUF ; ! evidential general past
! FIXME: do we need a {B}{A} form here that's Dir/LR ?

%<pcond%>:%>м%{A%}к V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                              ! 
%<neg%>%<pcond%>:%>м%{A%}к% эмес V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                 ! 

%<pih%>:%>ч%{U%} V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                                 ! 
%<neg%>%<pih%>:%>ч%{U%}% эмес V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                    ! 
%<neg%>%<pih%>:%>%{B%}%{A%}%>ч%{U%} V-PERS-COP-SUF ;              ! Dir/LR

!%<opt%>:%>м%{A%}к%>ч%{I%} V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                        !   

! Things without negative forms
%<pot%>:%>ч%{U%}%>д%{A%}й V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                        ! 
%<unac%>:%>%{E%}% элек V-PERS-COP-SUF ;                           ! 



LEXICON V-INFL-ASIF

%<prc_perf%>:%>%{I%}п # ;
%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-PAST ;
%<ger_past%>%<sim%>:%>%{G%}%{A%}н%>%{D%}%{A%}й PRED ; 
%<aor%>:%>%{E%} V-PERS-PRES ;

LEXICON V-INFL-TV-SHORT

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;
! FIXME: When we make it cyclical, this should really be V-INFL-TV
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-INFL-COMMON ;                              
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{Д%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;                             
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>%<caus%>:%>%{Д%}%{I%}р%>%{Д%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;                             
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>%<pass%>:%>%{Д%}%{I%}р%>%{I%}%{l%} V-INFL-COMMON ;                             
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}%{l%}%>%{Д%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;                             

! LEXICON V-INFL-IV-SHORT
! 
! %<v%>%<iv%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;
! ! FIXME: When we make it cyclical, this should really be V-INFL-IV
! %<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;                             
! %<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р%>%{D%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;                             
! %<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>%<pass%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р%>%{I%}%{l%} V-INFL-COMMON ;                             

LEXICON V-INFL-TV

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;
! FIXME: When we make it cyclical, this should really be V-INFL-TV
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-INFL-COMMON ;                              
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{Д%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;                             
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>%<caus%>:%>%{Д%}%{I%}р%>%{Д%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;                             
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>%<pass%>:%>%{Д%}%{I%}р%>%{I%}%{l%} V-INFL-COMMON ;                             
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>%<caus%>:%>%{I%}%{l%}%>%{Д%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;                             

LEXICON V-INFL-TV-NOPASS

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;
! %<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%>%{D%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-INFL-TV-PASS

%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>%<caus%>:%>%{Д%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;


LEXICON V-INFL-IV

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;
! FIXME: When we make it cyclical, this should really be V-INFL-TV
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%>%{Д%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;                             
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>%<caus%>:%>%{Д%}%{I%}р%>%{Д%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;                             
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>%<pass%>:%>%{Д%}%{I%}р%>%{I%}%{l%} V-INFL-COMMON ;                             

LEXICON V-INFL-TV-NO-CAUS

%<v%>%<tv%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS

%<v%>%<iv%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;


LEXICON V-INFL-TV-IRREG-CAUS

%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>:%> V-INFL-COMMON ;                                    !
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>%<caus%>:%>%{Д%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;                                    !
%<v%>%<tv%>%<caus%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-INFL-COMMON ;                             !  FIXME: When we make it cyclical, this should really be V-INFL-TV

LEXICON V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS

%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>:%> V-INFL-COMMON ;                                    !
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>%<caus%>:%>%{Д%}%{I%}р V-INFL-COMMON ;                                    !
%<v%>%<iv%>%<caus%>%<pass%>:%>%{I%}%{l%} V-INFL-COMMON ;                             !  FIXME: When we make it cyclical, this should really be V-INFL-TV

LEXICON VAUX-INFL

%<vaux%>: V-INFL-COMMON ;

!LEXICON VAUX-ELE
!
!%<vaux%>: V-PERS-COND ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                  L E X I C O N    E N T R I E S                         !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Miscellaneous
! 
! ! FIXME: сыяктуу and экен have special grammar, but are ~modal particles
! сыяктуу:сыяктуу PART ; ! modal particle; adjective, usually with dative "similar to"
! экен:экен PART ; ! non-eyewitness modal particle
! экен:экен PART-PERS-COP ; ! non-eyewitness modal particle
! !эле PART-PERS-PAST ; ! 
! 
! ! FIXME: Add the other forms as Dir/LR
бы%<qst%>:%~бы # ; ! Dir/RL 
бы%<qst%>:бы # ; ! Dir/LR 
!бекен%<qst%>:%~бекен # ; ! Dir/RL
!бекен%<qst%>:бекен # ; ! Dir/LR
!го%<mod_ass%>:%~го # ; ! Dir/RL
!го%<mod_ass%>:го # ; ! Dir/LR
!чы%<qst%>:чы # ; 
го%<mod%>:го # ;
да%<mod%>:да # ;
имиш%<mod%>:имиш # ;
бы%<mod%>+де%<v%>%<iv%>%<aor%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:бейм # ;
! the following are already in the Copula lexicon
!бы%<qst%>+эле%<mod%>:беле V-PERS-PAST ;
!бы%<qst%>+экен%<mod%>:бекен V-PERS-COP ;


LEXICON Postadverbs

да:да POSTADV ; ! "even"
гана:гана POSTADV ; ! "only"
эле:эле POSTADV ; ! "only"
деле:деле POSTADV ; ! "even"
деле:дале POSTADV ; ! "even" ! Dir/LR
дагы:дагы POSTADV ; ! "... дагы" = "and ... too"
ашуун:ашуун POSTADV ; ! "more than"
ашык:ашык POSTADV ; ! "more than"
тең:тең POSTADV ; ! "~both" e.g., экөө тең
болсо:болсо POSTADV ; ! "as for"
эмес:эмес POSTADV ; ! "not"

LEXICON AdjectivePrefixes

%[%-red%]:%{redC%}%{redV%}п%> Adjectives ;
%[%-red%]:%{redC%}%{redV%}п%-%> Adjectives ; ! Dir/LR


LEXICON Copula

э%<cop%>%<ger_past%>:экен POSSESSION ;
э%<cop%>%<ger_perf%>:экен%>%{L%}%{I%}к POSSESSION ;

э%<cop%>%<aor%>%<evid%>:экен V-PERS-COP-SUF ; 
э%<cop%>%<aor%>%<evid%>%[%-qst%]:бекен V-PERS-COP-SUF ; 
э%<cop%>%<aor%>%<evid%>%<neg%>:эмес% экен V-PERS-COP-SUF ; 

э%<cop%>%<ifi%>:эле V-PERS-PAST ;
э%<cop%>%<ifi%>%[%-qst%]:беле V-PERS-PAST ;

э%<cop%>%<aor%>%<neg%>:эмес V-PERS-COP-SUF ; 

э%<cop%>%<aor%>: V-PERS-COP-SUF ; ! Dir/RL ! for below reason?
э%<cop%>%<aor%>%<p3%>%<sg%>: # ; ! Dir/RL ! to generate nothing if attached to an unknown form
э%<cop%>%<aor%>%<p3%>%<pl%>: # ; ! Dir/RL

LEXICON Verbs
жат:жат VAUX-INFL ; ! 
жат:ат VAUX-INFL ; ! Dir/LR
кал:кал VAUX-INFL ; ! 
жүр:жүр VAUX-INFL ; ! 
ал:ал VAUX-INFL ; ! 
отур:отур VAUX-INFL ; ! 
тур:тур VAUX-INFL ; ! 
сал:сал VAUX-INFL ; ! 
кет:кет VAUX-INFL ; ! 
чык:чык VAUX-INFL ; !
бер:бер VAUX-INFL ; !
бол:бол VAUX-INFL ; !
бүт:бүт VAUX-INFL ; !
башта:башта VAUX-INFL ; !
жазда:жазда VAUX-INFL ; !
кел:кел VAUX-INFL ; !
ий:ий VAUX-INFL ; !
жибер:жибер VAUX-INFL ; !
кой:кой VAUX-INFL ; !
айлан:айландыр V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! 
алып% кет:алып% кет V-INFL-TV ; ! "take away"
аш:аш V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "pass/exceed"
аш:ашыр V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "make exceed"
бүт:бүт V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "to finish"
бүт:бүтүр V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "to finish"
жайгаш:жайгаш V-INFL-IV ; ! "be located"
жат:жат V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "lie"
жат:жаткыз V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "lie down"
де:де V-INFL-TV-SHORT ; ! "say"
же:же V-INFL-TV-SHORT ; ! "eat"
жуу:жуу V-INFL-TV-SHORT ; ! "wash"
куу:куу V-INFL-TV-SHORT ; ! "chase"
зыян% кел:зыян% кел V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "for harm to come"
зыян% кел:зыян% келтир V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "to cause harm"
кел:кел V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "come"
кел:келтир V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "make come"
келтир:келтир V-INFL-TV ; ! ""
кет:кет V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "go away / leave"
кет:кетир V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "to make leave"
тарт:тарт V-INFL-TV ;
тий:тийгиз V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "make touch"
тур:тур V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "stand, live"
тур:тургуз V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "stand up (trans)"
ук:ук V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "listen"
ук:угуз V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "make listen"
өл:өл V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "die"
өл:өлтүр V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "kill"
өт:өт V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "pass by"
өт:өт V-INFL-TV-NO-CAUS ; ! "pass, conduct"
өт:өткөр V-INFL-TV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "pass, conduct"
өт:өткөз V-INFL-TV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "pass, conduct"  ! Dir/LR
ак:ак V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "flow"
ак:агыз V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "make flow"
отур:отур V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ;  ! "sit"
отур:олтур V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "sit"        ! Dir/LR
отур:отургуз V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ;  ! "sit"
отур:олтургуз V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "sit"  ! Dir/LR
аракет% кыл:аракет% кыл V-INFL-IV ; ! "try"
боё:боё V-INFL-TV ; ! "paint"
быш:быш V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "cook" / "be cooked"
кий:кий V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "get dressed"
кий:кийгиз V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "dress"
тан:тан V-INFL-TV ;
кал:кал V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "stay, remain"
кес:кес V-INFL-TV ; ! "cut"
кир:кир V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "enter"
кир:киргиз V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "put in, enter (e.g. data)"
чыда:чыда V-INFL-IV ; ! "be patient"
көч:көч V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "move"
көчүр:көчүр V-INFL-TV ; ! "make move, copy" ! Use/MT
көр:көр V-INFL-TV-NOPASS ; ! "see"
көр:көрүн V-INFL-TV-PASS ; ! "be seen"
көр:көр%>%{G%}%{A%}з V-INFL-TV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "understand"
сайра:сайра V-INFL-IV ; 
сыла:сыла V-INFL-TV ; 
таң% кал:таң% калтыр V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "surprise"
той:той V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "be full/sated"
тол:толтур V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "fill"
төмөнсүн:төмөнсүн V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "to feel down" 
түш:түшүр V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "to make fall"
төк:төк V-INFL-IV ; ! "[for e.g. rain] to pour"
чумку:чумку V-INFL-TV ; 
чык:чык V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "to exit/leave"
өч:өчүр V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "make turn off"
кат:кат V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "get hard"
улан:улант V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! Dir/LR
ишке% ашыр:ишке% ашыр V-INFL-IV ;
күт:күт V-INFL-TV ; ! "wait for"
жет:жет V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; 
жет:жеткир V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ;
чогул:чогулт V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ;
тезде:тезде V-INFL-IV ;
сын% пикир% айт:сын% пикир% айт V-INFL-TV ;
камты:камты V-INFL-TV ;
түшүн:түшүн V-INFL-TV-NO-CAUS ; ! "understand"
түшүн:түшүндүр V-INFL-TV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "understand"
кийлигиш:кийлигиш V-INFL-IV ;
жарыш:жарыш V-INFL-TV ;
жөнө:жөнө V-INFL-IV ;
корк:корк V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "be scared"
корк:коркут V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ;  ! "scare"  (in theory the phonology should do this)
бекин:бекин V-INFL-TV ;
үркү:үркү V-INFL-IV ;
корго:корго V-INFL-TV ; ! "protect"
үн% сал:үн% сал V-INFL-IV ;
көлөкөлө:көлөкөлө V-INFL-TV ;
жалын:жалын V-INFL-IV ;
сын:сын V-INFL-IV ; ! "break"
көгөр:көгөр V-INFL-IV ;
карама-каршы% чык:карама-каршы% чык V-INFL-IV ;
жылаңачта:жылаңачта V-INFL-TV ;
кана:кана V-INFL-IV ;
бакыр:бакыр V-INFL-IV ; ! "shout"
капа% кыл:капа% кыл V-INFL-TV ;
тий:тий V-INFL-IV-NO-CAUS ; ! "touch"
тий:тийгиз V-INFL-IV-IRREG-CAUS ; ! "make touch"
аныкта:аныкта V-INFL-IV ;
мөөрлө:мөөрлө V-INFL-TV ;
жаманда:жаманда V-INFL-IV ;
шарттарга% байла:шарттарга% байла V-INFL-TV ;
тарсай:тарсай V-INFL-IV ;
көктө:көктө V-INFL-TV ;
кыймылда:кыймылда V-INFL-IV ;
аласта:аласта V-INFL-TV ;
күлдө:күлдө V-INFL-TV ;
сөк:сөк V-INFL-IV ;
капка% сал:капка% сал V-INFL-TV ;
бөлүктөргө% ажыра:бөлүктөргө% ажыра V-INFL-IV ;
талыт:талыт V-INFL-TV ;
жумурткала:жумурткала V-INFL-IV ; ! "to lay eggs" 
бөлө:бөлө V-INFL-TV ; ! "пеленать"
жук:жук V-INFL-IV ; ! "be caught (illness)"
